sl-SI: Končno prozorno lepilo (po sušenju): Prozorno s sijajem; Prozorno v matirani izvedbi; Kristalno prozorno; Prosojno; Drugo
pl: Wykończenie kleju przezroczystego po wyschnięciu: Przezroczyste z błyszczącym wykończeniem; Przezroczyste z matowym wykończeniem; Krystalicznie przezroczyste; Półprzezroczyste; Inne
nb: Gjennomsiktig limfinish (etter tørking): Klar med glans; Klar med matt overflate; Krystallklar; Gjennomskinnelig; Annen
en: Clear glue finish (after drying): Clear with gloss finish; Clear with matte finish; Crystal clear; Translucent; Other
vi: Độ hoàn thiện của keo trong suốt (sau khi khô): Trong suốt có lớp hoàn thiện bóng; Trong suốt có lớp hoàn thiện mờ; Trong vắt; Bán trong suốt; Khác
ro-RO: Finisajul adezivului transparent (după uscare): Transparent cu finisaj lucios; Transparent cu finisaj mat; Transparent cristal; Translucid; Altele
sv: Ytfinish på det genomskinliga limmet (efter torkning): Genomskinlig med blank finish; Genomskinlig med matt finish; Kristallklar; Halvgenomskinlig; Annan
it: Finitura trasparente della colla (dopo l'asciugatura): Trasparente con finitura lucida; Trasparente con finitura opaca; Cristallino; Traslucido; Altro
zh-TW: 透明膠水乾燥後效果: 透明亮面; 透明霧面; 水晶般透明; 半透明; 其他
pt-BR: Acabamento da cola transparente (após a secagem): Transparente com acabamento brilhante; Transparente com acabamento fosco; Cristalino; Translúcido; Outro
es: Acabado de pegamento transparente (después del secado): Transparente con acabado brillante; Transparente con acabado mate; Totalmente transparente; Translúcido; Otro
cs: Povrchový vzhled průhledného lepidla (po zaschnutí): Průhledné s lesklým povrchem; Průhledné s matným povrchem; Křišťálově průhledné; Průsvitné; Jiné
da: Finish for klar lim (efter tørring): Klar med blank finish; Klar med mat finish; Krystalklar; Gennemskinnelig; Andet
nl: Transparante lijm afwerking na droging: Transparant met glanzende afwerking; Transparant met matte afwerking; Glashelder; Doorschijnend; Anders
ko: 투명 접착제 건조 후 마감: 광택 마감 투명색; 무광택 투명; 완전 투명; 반투명; 기타
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava priehľadného lepidla (po zaschnutí): Priehľadné s lesklým povrchom; Priehľadné s matným povrchom; Krištáľovo čisté; Priesvitné; Iné
ru: Отделка прозрачного клея (после высыхания): Прозрачный с глянцевым эффектом; Прозрачный с матовым эффектом; Кристально прозрачный; Полупрозрачный; Другой
zh-CN: 透明胶涂层（干燥后）: 透明亮光; 透明哑光; 水晶般透明; 半透明; 其他
fi: Läpinäkyvä liimapinta (kuivumisen jälkeen): Kirkas, kiiltävä pinta; Kirkas, mattapinta; Kristallinkirkas; Puoliläpinäkyvä; Muu
pt-PT: Acabamento com cola transparente (após secagem): Transparente com acabamento brilhante; Transparente com acabamento mate; Cristalino; Translúcido; Outro
th: ลักษณะผิวของกาว (หลังแห้ง): โปร่งใสเคลือบเงา; โปร่งใสเคลือบด้าน; ใสเหมือนคริสตัล; โปร่งแสง; อื่นๆ
de: Oberflächenfinish des transparenten Klebstoffs (nach dem Trocknen): Transparent mit glänzendem Finish; Transparent mit mattem Finish; Kristallklar; Durchscheinend; Sonstige
hu: Átlátszó ragasztóbevonat (száradás után): Átlátszó, fényes felületű; Átlátszó, matt felületű; Kristálytiszta; Áttetsző; Egyéb
fr: Finition de la colle transparente (après séchage): Transparent avec finition brillante; Transparent avec finition mate; Cristallin; Translucide; Autre
lt-LT: Skaidrių klijų apdaila (po išdžiūvimo): Skaidri, blizgi; Skaidri, matinė; Visiškai skaidri; Pusiau skaidri; Kita
ja: 透明接着剤仕上げ（乾燥後）: 透明で光沢のある仕上がり; 透明でマットな仕上がり; クリスタルクリア; 半透明; その他
el: Φινίρισμα διαφανούς κόλλας (μετά το στέγνωμα): Διάφανο με γυαλιστερό φινίρισμα; Διάφανο με ματ φινίρισμα; Απόλυτα διάφανο; Ημιδιαφανές; Άλλο
bg-BG: Финиш на прозрачното лепило (след изсъхване): Прозрачно с гланцов завършек; Прозрачно с матов завършек; Кристално прозрачно; Полупрозрачно; Друго
tr: Şeffaf yapıştırıcı kuruma sonrası görünümü: Şeffaf ve parlak bitişli; Şeffaf ve mat bitişli; Kristal berraklığında; Yarı saydam; Diğer
hr-HR: Prozirni ljepljivi premaz (nakon sušenja): Prozirno sa sjajnim završetkom; Prozirno s mat završetkom; Kristalno prozirno; Poluprozirno; Ostalo